Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-118
Clay.

The county of Clay is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township five, north, of range eight, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township five, north, of range five, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township eight, north, of range five, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township eight, north, of range eight, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 11, p. 214;

R.S.1913, § 831;

C.S.1922, § 733;

C.S.1929, § 25-120;

R.S.1943, § 22-118.